Utah statutes.
63A-3-404.   Rulemaking authority.
(1)  After consultation with the board, and in accordance with Title 63G,
Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the Division of Finance shall
make rules to:
(a)  require participating state entities to provide public financial
information for inclusion on the Utah Public Finance Website;
(b)  define, either uniformly for all participating state entities, or on an
entity by entity basis, the term "public financial information" using the
standards provided in Subsection 63A-3-403(2)(c); and
(c)  establish procedures for obtaining, submitting, reporting, storing, and
providing public financial information on the Utah Public Finance Website,
which may include a specified reporting frequency and form.
(2)  After consultation with the board, and in accordance with Title 63G,
Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the Division of Finance may
make rules to:
(a)  require a participating state or local entity to list certain
expenditures made by a person under a contract with the entity; and
(b)  if a list is required under Subsection (2)(a), require the following
information to be included:
(i)  the name of the participating state or local entity making the
expenditure;
(ii)  the name of the person receiving the expenditure;
(iii)  the date of the expenditure;
(iv)  the amount of the expenditure;
(v)  the purpose of the expenditure;
(vi)  the name of each party to the contract;
(vii)  an electronic copy of the contract; or
(viii)  any other criteria designated by rule.
